Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2601YH (5) 91 ss/ns H.F. 582 Section 1. Section 48A.38, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 f. The county commissioner of registration and the state 3 registrar of voters shall remove a voterâs whole or partial 4 social security number, as applicable, voter identification 5 number assigned by the state commissioner, date of birth, 6 home address, Iowa driverâs license number, or and Iowa 7 nonoperatorâs identification card number from a voter 8 registration list prepared pursuant to this section . 9